tools/goldendict_for_japnese_portable/GoldenDict/content/morphology/es_ES.aff
SFX W   ernar iernes      ernar
SFX W   errar ierres      errar
SFX W   ertar iertes      ertar
SFX W   esar  ieses       esar
SFX W   estar iestes      estar
SFX W   etar  ietes       etar
SFX W   ezar  ieces       ezar
SFX W   ijar  íjes        [ae]hijar
SFX W   ilar  íles        [ae]hilar
SFX W   inar  ínes        [aeo]hinar
SFX W   itar  ítes        [ae]hitar
SFX W   umar  úmes        [ae]humar
SFX W   usar  úses        [ae]husar
SFX W   izar  íces        [ae]izar
SFX W   uar   úes         [^g]uar
SFX W   onzar üences      gonzar
SFX W   uar   ües         guar
SFX W   obar  uebes       obar
SFX W   oblar uebles      oblar
SFX W   ocar  ueques      ocar
SFX W   odar  uedes       odar
SFX W   ogar  uegues      ogar
SFX W   olar  ueles       olar
SFX W   ollar uelles      [^g]ollar
SFX W   oldar üeldes      goldar
SFX W   oldar ueldes      [^g]oldar
SFX W   ollar üelles      gollar
SFX W   olcar uelques     olcar
SFX W   olgar uelgues     olgar
SFX W   oltar ueltes      oltar
SFX W   onar  uenes       onar
SFX W   oñar  ueñes       oñar
SFX W   ontar uentes      ontar
SFX W   ontrar uentres     ontrar
SFX W   orar  ueres       [^g]orar
SFX W   orar  üeres       gorar
SFX W   orcar uerques     orcar
SFX W   ordar uerdes      ordar
SFX W   ornar uernes      ornar
SFX W   ortar uertes      ortar
SFX W   orzar uerces      orzar
SFX W   osar  ueses       osar
SFX W   ostar uestes      ostar
SFX W   ostrar uestres     ostrar
SFX W   ovar  ueves       ovar
SFX W   gar   egues       ugar
SFX W   cer   zcas        [^fh]acer
SFX W   cer   gas         [fh]acer
SFX W   er    gas         aler
SFX W   er    igas        aer
SFX W   caber quepas      caber
SFX W   cer   zcas        ecer
SFX W   eder  iedas       eder
SFX W   er    as          [eo]er
SFX W   er    igas        oer
SFX W   er    yas         oer
SFX W   ender iendas      ender
SFX W   er    gas         [eo]ner
SFX W   erder ierdas      erder
SFX W   erer  ieras       erer
SFX W   erner iernas      erner
SFX W   erter iertas      erter
SFX W   ocer  uezas       cocer
SFX W   cer   zcas        [^c]ocer
SFX W   oder  uedas       oder
SFX W   oler  uelas       oler
SFX W   olver uelvas      olver
SFX W   orcer uerzas      orcer
SFX W   order uerdas      order
SFX W   over  uevas       over
SFX W   aber  epas        saber
SFX W   ir    gas         alir
SFX W   ebir  ibas        ebir
SFX W   ecir  igas        ecir
SFX W   edir  idas        edir
SFX W   egir  ijas        egir
SFX W   emir  imas        emir
SFX W   eír   ías         eír
SFX W   eñir  iñas        eñir
SFX W   eguir igas        eguir
SFX W   enchir inchas      enchir
SFX W   endir indas       endir
SFX W   enir  engas       enir
SFX W   entir ientas      entir
SFX W   erir  ieras       erir
SFX W   ernir iernas      ernir
SFX W   ertir iertas      ertir
SFX W   ervir irvas       [^h]ervir
SFX W   estir istas       estir
SFX W   unir  únas        eunir
SFX W   etir  itas        etir
SFX W   ervir iervas      hervir
SFX W   irir  ieras       irir
SFX W   ibir  íbas        ohibir
SFX W   ír    igas        oír
SFX W   orir  ueras       orir
SFX W   ormir uermas      ormir
SFX W   cir   zcas        ucir
SFX W   ir    yas         [^g]uir
SFX W   üir   uyas        güir
SFX W   ir    as          ullir
SFX W   ir    as          uñir
SFX W   iar   iemos       iar
SFX W   ar    emos        ebrar
SFX W   ar    emos        edrar
SFX W   gar   guemos      egar
SFX W   ar    emos        elar
SFX W   ar    emos        evar
SFX W   ar    emos        emblar
SFX W   ar    emos        embrar
SFX W   ar    emos        [ae]ndar
SFX W   ar    emos        endrar
SFX W   gar   guemos      engar
SFX W   ar    emos        ensar
SFX W   ar    emos        entar
SFX W   zar   cemos       enzar
SFX W   ar    emos        erbar
SFX W   ar    emos        ernar
SFX W   ar    emos        errar
SFX W   ar    emos        ertar
SFX W   ar    emos        esar
SFX W   ar    emos        estar
SFX W   ar    emos        etar
SFX W   zar   cemos       ezar
SFX W   ar    emos        [aeo]hi[jlnt]ar
SFX W   ar    emos        [ae]hu[ms]ar
SFX W   zar   cemos       [ae]izar
SFX W   zar   cemos       gonzar
SFX W   ar    emos        [^g]uar
SFX W   uar   üemos       guar
SFX W   ar    emos        obar
SFX W   ar    emos        oblar
SFX W   car   quemos      ocar
SFX W   ar    emos        odar
SFX W   gar   guemos      ogar
SFX W   ar    emos        olar
SFX W   car   quemos      olcar
SFX W   ar    uemos       olgar
SFX W   ar    emos        oldar
SFX W   ar    emos        ollar
SFX W   ar    emos        oltar
SFX W   ar    emos        onar
SFX W   ar    emos        oñar
SFX W   ar    emos        ontar
SFX W   ar    emos        ontrar
SFX W   ar    emos        orar
SFX W   car   quemos      orcar
SFX W   ar    emos        ordar
SFX W   ar    emos        ornar
SFX W   ar    emos        ortar
SFX W   zar   cemos       orzar
SFX W   ar    emos        osar
SFX W   ar    emos        ostar
SFX W   ar    emos        ostrar
SFX W   ar    emos        ovar
SFX W   gar   guemos      ugar
SFX W   cer   zcamos      [^fh]acer
SFX W   cer   gamos       [fh]acer
SFX W   er    gamos       aler
SFX W   er    igamos      aer
SFX W   caber quepamos    caber
SFX W   cer   zcamos      ecer
SFX W   er    amos        eder
SFX W   er    amos        [eo]er
SFX W   er    igamos      oer
SFX W   er    yamos       oer
SFX W   er    amos        ender
SFX W   er    gamos       [eo]ner
SFX W   er    amos        erder
SFX W   er    amos        erer
SFX W   er    amos        erner
SFX W   er    amos        erter
SFX W   cer   zamos       cocer
SFX W   cer   zcamos      [^c]ocer
SFX W   er    amos        oder
SFX W   er    amos        oler
SFX W   er    amos        olver
SFX W   cer   zamos       orcer
SFX W   er    amos        order
SFX W   er    amos        over
SFX W   aber  epamos      saber
SFX W   ir    gamos       alir
SFX W   ebir  ibamos      ebir
SFX W   ecir  igamos      ecir
SFX W   edir  idamos      edir
SFX W   egir  ijamos      egir
SFX W   emir  imamos      emir
SFX W   eír   iamos       eír
SFX W   eñir  iñamos      eñir
SFX W   eguir igamos      eguir
SFX W   enchir inchamos    enchir
SFX W   endir indamos     endir
SFX W   enir  engamos     enir
SFX W   entir intamos     entir
SFX W   erir  iramos      erir
SFX W   ir    amos        ernir
SFX W   ertir irtamos     ertir
SFX W   ervir irvamos     ervir
SFX W   estir istamos     estir
SFX W   ir    amos        eunir
SFX W   etir  itamos      etir
SFX W   ir    amos        irir
SFX W   ir    amos        ohibir
SFX W   ír    igamos      oír
SFX W   orir  uramos      orir
SFX W   ormir urmamos     ormir
SFX W   cir   zcamos      ucir
SFX W   ir    yamos       [^g]uir
SFX W   üir   uyamos      güir
SFX W   ir    amos        ullir
SFX W   ir    amos        uñir
SFX W   ar    éis         iar
SFX W   ar    éis         ebrar
SFX W   ar    éis         edrar
SFX W   gar   guéis       egar
SFX W   ar    éis         elar
SFX W   ar    éis         evar
SFX W   ar    éis         emblar
SFX W   ar    éis         embrar
SFX W   ar    éis         [ae]ndar
SFX W   ar    éis         endrar
SFX W   gar   guéis       engar
SFX W   ar    éis         ensar
SFX W   ar    éis         entar
SFX W   zar   céis        enzar
SFX W   ar    éis         erbar
SFX W   ar    éis         ernar
SFX W   ar    éis         errar
SFX W   ar    éis         ertar
SFX W   ar    éis         esar
SFX W   ar    éis         estar
SFX W   ar    éis         etar
SFX W   zar   céis        ezar
SFX W   ar    éis         [aeo]hi[jlnt]ar
SFX W   ar    éis         [ae]hu[ms]ar
SFX W   zar   céis        [ae]izar
SFX W   zar   céis        gonzar
SFX W   ar    éis         [^g]uar
SFX W   uar   üéis        guar
SFX W   ar    éis         obar
SFX W   ar    éis         oblar
SFX W   car   quéis       ocar
SFX W   ar    éis         odar
SFX W   ogar  guéis       ogar
SFX W   ar    éis         olar
SFX W   car   quéis       olcar
SFX W   ar    éis         oldar
SFX W   ar    uéis        olgar
