tools/goldendict_for_japnese_portable/GoldenDict/content/morphology/es_ES.dic
abastecer/IOQRTWX
abonanzar/PSVWX
aburrar/OPRSVWX
acanalar/PSVWX
acañaverear/PSVWX
achicharrar/LOPQRSTVWX
acogotar/PSVWX
acorvar/PQSTVWX
acuchillar/OPQRSTVWX
adestrar/PQSTVWX
adueñar/OPRSVWX
afincar/OPRSVWX
agarrotear/PSVWX
aguantar/OPQRSTVWX
ahoyar/PSVWX
alanzar/PSVWX
alentar/NOPQRSTWX
alisar/PQSTVWX
alterar/HLOPQRSTVWX
amancillar/PSVWX
amblar/PSVWX
amodorrar/IOPRSVWX
amprar/PSVWX
angelizar/PSVWX
anudar/IPQSTVWX
aparvar/PSVWX
aperrear/PSVWX
apolillar/PSVWX
apuntillar/PSVWX
arenar/HPSVWX
arrear/PQSTVWX
arropar/OPQRSTVWX
aseglarizar/PSVWX
asombrar/OPQRSTVWX
ataquizar/PSVWX
atildar/IPSVWX
atrampar/OPQRSTVWX
aupar/OPQRSTVWX
avergonzar/OPQRSTWX
azotar/IOPQRSTVWX
balar/LPSVWX
barajar/OPQRSTVWX
barretear/PSVWX
bazuquear/PSVWX
bisbisar/PQSTVWX
bolear/PSVWX
borronear/PSVWX
bucear/PSVWX
cabildear/PSVWX
calabrotar/PSVWX
cambalachear/PSVWX
capear/PSVWX
carecer/IWX
castellanizar/PSVWX
cebadar/PSVWX
cerrajear/PSVWX
chapucear/PQSTVWX
chiflar/OPQRSTVWX
chufletear/PSVWX
circuncidar/PQSTVWX
clocar/PSWX
coincidir/VWX
comisar/PSVWX
compulsar/HPQSTVWX
conducir/OQRTWX
conmutar/HOPQRSTVWX
consumir/HIOQRTVWX
contramarcar/PSVWX
conversar/HPSVWX
coreografiar/PQSTWX
costear/OPQRSTVWX
cristalizar/HPSVWX
cucharear/PSVWX
currar/LPSVWX
decelerar/HPQSTVWX
deificar/HPSVWX
denigrar/HLPQSTVWX
derrabar/PSVWX
desacertar/NPSWX
desagradar/OPRSVWX
desaliñar/PSVWX
desanudar/PSVWX
desarrebozar/PSVWX
desatinar/PQSTVWX
desbarbar/PSVWX
descabellar/IPQSTVWX
descantear/PSVWX
descaspar/PSVWX
desclasificar/HPQSTVWX
desconchabar/OPQRSTVWX
descostillar/PSVWX
desdar/PSVWX
desembaular/PSVWX
desempalmar/PQSTVWX
desencaminar/PSVWX
desenfardar/PSVWX
desenladrillar/PSVWX
desentender/ORWX
desesperar/HLNOPQRSTVWX
desflemar/PSVWX
desgranzar/PSVWX
deshijar/PSVWX
desinflamar/PSVWX
deslenguar/PSWX
desmantecar/PSVWX
desmitificar/HPQSTVWX
desocupar/HOPQRSTVWX
despachar/OPQRSTVWX
desparramar/IOPQRSTVWX
desperdigar/IPSVWX
desplantar/HPSVWX
despreocupar/HOPRSVWX
desraspar/PSVWX
desterrar/OPQRSTWX
destruir/OQWYZ
desvariar/PSWX
deterger/QTVWX
diamantar/PSVWX
dinamitar/PQSTVWX
discutir/OQRTVWX
disputar/OPQRSTVWX
domeñar/PQSTVWX
echacorvear/PSVWX
elegir/OQWYZ
embancar/OPRSVWX
embeleñar/PSVWX
emboquillar/PSVWX
embrazar/PSVWX
emerger/VWX
empapirotar/PSVWX
empelechar/PSVWX
empingorotar/PSVWX
empreñar/PSVWX
enalmagrar/PSVWX
encabullar/PSVWX
encambijar/PSVWX
encanutar/PSVWX
encarnecer/WX
encauzar/IPQSTVWX
enchapar/PSVWX
enclavar/HIPSVWX
encorar/PSWX
encubar/PSVWX
endurar/PSVWX
enflorecer/WX
engalanar/OPQRSTVWX
engatar/PSVWX
engrapar/PSVWX
engurruñar/PSVWX
enjergar/PSVWX
enmarañar/IPSVWX
enristrar/PSVWX
ensordecer/IOQRTWX
entrañar/OPQRSTVWX
entrujar/PSVWX
enzarzar/OPQRSTVWX
erutar/HPSVWX
escaldufar/PSVWX
escasear/PSVWX
esculcar/PSVWX
espatarrar/OPRSVWX
estaquillar/PQSTVWX
execrar/HPQSTVWX
eyacular/HOPRSVWX
fibrilar/HPSVWX
formular/HOPQRSTUVWX
galantear/PSVWX
germanizar/HOPQRSTVWX
grapar/PQSTVWX
hachar/PQSTVWX
hermanar/IOPQRSTVWX
hollar/PSWX
husmear/PQSTVWX
impugnar/HPQSTVWX
inervar/HPQSTVWX
insistir/VWX
intubar/HPQSTVWX
jaricar/PSVWX
lactar/HLPQSTVWX
latrocinar/PSVWX
linchar/IPQSTVWX
lustrar/HPSVWX
mallar/PSVWX
manojear/PSVWX
marrullar/PSVWX
melar/PSWX
mezclar/IOPQRSTUVWX
moderar/HLNOPQRSTVWX
mordiscar/PSVWX
murmujear/PSVWX
nitrar/PQSTVWX
octavar/PSVWX
orlar/PSVWX
palpar/HIPQSTVWX
pasamanar/PQSTVWX
pendonear/PSVWX
personalizar/PQSTVWX
pintonear/PSVWX
platinar/PSVWX
porgar/PSVWX
prefigurar/HPQSTVWX
privatizar/HPQSTVWX
proveer/OQWY
quejar/OPRSVWX
rapiñar/PSVWX
realegrar/OPRSVWX
rebumbar/PSVWX
recinchar/PSVWX
recrudecer/IWX
reescribir/OQRTUVWY
regocijar/NOPRSVWX
relativizar/PQSTVWX
remover/IOQRTWX
repiquetear/PSVWX
rescaldar/PSVWX
restregar/IPQSTWX
retrillar/PSVWX
rezumar/PSVWX
roscar/PQSTVWX
sachar/PSVWX
saponificar/HPSVWX
servar/PSVWX
sobajar/IPSVWX
sobrescribir/VWY
sombrar/PSVWX
suavizar/HLOPQRSTVWX
supervivir/LVWX
tamborilear/PQSTVWX
teledirigir/QTVWX
tijeretear/PSVWX
torrear/PSVWX
transfundir/HVWX
trasmitir/QTVWX
trepidar/HLPSVWX
trujamanear/PSVWX
usurar/PSVWX
velejar/PSVWX
virilizar/HOPRSVWX
zafar/OPQRSTVWX
zurrar/OPQRSTVWX
